ncx.lexc
LEXICON Tinemi-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>nemi # ;
@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>:@R.PST@%>ti%>nemi%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%>ti%>nemi%>ya%>j # ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>nemi%>s # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@%<aux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@%>ti%>nemi%>s%>kej # ;
%<aux%>%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>k # ;
@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:@R.PST@%>ti%>nen%>to%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%>ti%>nen%>to%>ya%>j # ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>s # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@%>ti%>nen%>to%>s%>kej # ;

LEXICON Tijtia-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>jtia # ;
@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>:@R.PST@%>ti%>jtia%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%>ti%>jtia%>ya%>j # ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>jti%>s # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@%<aux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@%>ti%>jti%>s%>kej # ;
%<aux%>%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>k # ;
@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:@R.PST@%>ti%>jti%>to%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@%>ti%>jti%>to%>ya%>j # ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>s # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@%>ti%>jti%>to%>s%>kej # ;

LEXICON Tiuits-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>uits # ;
! TODO: figure out the rest of these (TAM)

LEXICON Neki-Aux
%<aux%>:neki # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@%<aux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@neki%>j # ;


LEXICON IV-Raiz

nejnemi%<iv%>:nejne%{M%}   TAM-Clase2-i ;
kochi%<iv%>:koch           TAM-Clase2-i ;
kalaki%<iv%>:kalak         TAM-Clase2-i ;
uetsi%<iv%>:uets           TAM-Clase2-i ;
miki%<iv%>:mik             TAM-Clase2-i ;
patlani%<iv%>:patlan       TAM-Clase2-i ;
nemi%<iv%>:ne%{m%}         TAM-Clase2-i ;

kisa%<iv%>:kis		   TAM-Clase2-a ;

palti%<iv%>:palti	   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "mojarse"

kualtia%<iv%>:kualti	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "servir/estar bueno/no pudrido"



LEXICON TV-Raiz

kua%<tv%>:kua		   TAM-Clase4 ; ! "consumir/comer"
paleuia%<tv%>:paleui	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "ayudar"

chiua%<tv%>:chiu           TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "hacer"
kaua%<tv%>:kau             TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "dejar"
koua%<tv%>:kou             TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "comprar"

kaki%<tv%>:kak             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "escuchar"
mati%<tv%>:mat             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "saber"

namaka%<tv%>:namaka	   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "vender s.t.

LEXICON DV-Raiz
maka%<tv2%>:maka       	   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "dar"
